Rhode Island, session 2026, HB7947.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Sections 27-20.8-1 and 27-20.8-5 of the General Laws in Chapter 27-20.8
entitled "Prescription Drug Benefits" is hereby amended to read as follows:
27-20.8-1. Definitions.
For the purposes of this chapter, the following terms shall mean:
(1) "Cost sharing" shall mean any copayment, coinsurance, deductible, or annual limitation
on cost sharing (including, but not limited to, a limitation subject to 42 U.S.C. §§ 18022(c) and
300gg-6(b)), required by or on behalf of an enrollee in order to receive a specific healthcare service,
including a prescription drug, covered by a health plan, whether covered under the medical or
pharmacy benefit.
(1)(2) “Director” shall mean the director of the department of business regulation.
(2)(3) “Health plan” shall mean an insurance carrier as defined in chapters 18, 19, 20, and
41 of this title.
(3)(4) “Insured” shall mean any person who is entitled to have pharmacy services paid by
a health plan pursuant to a policy, certificate, contract, or agreement of insurance or coverage
including those administered for the health plan under a contract with a third-party administrator
that manages pharmacy benefits or pharmacy network contracts.
(5) "Insurer" shall mean any person, firm, or corporation offering and/or insuring
healthcare services on a prepaid basis including, but not limited to, a nonprofit service corporation,
a health maintenance organization, the Rhode Island Medicaid program, including its contracted

managed care entities, or an entity offering a policy of accident and sickness insurance.
(6) "Person" shall mean a natural person, corporation, mutual company, unincorporated
association, partnership, joint venture, limited liability company, trust, estate, foundation, nonprofit
corporation, unincorporated organization, or government or governmental subdivision or agency.
(7) "Pharmacy benefit manager" shall mean any person or business who administers the
prescription drug or device program of one or more health plans on behalf of a third party in
accordance with a pharmacy benefit program. This term includes any agent or representative of a
pharmacy benefit manager hired or contracted by the pharmacy benefit manager to assist in the
administering of the drug program and any wholly or partially owned or controlled subsidiary of a
pharmacy benefit manager.
27-20.8-5. Cost sharing calculation.
(a) When calculating an enrollee’s overall contribution to any out-of-pocket maximum or
any cost sharing requirement under a health plan, an insurer or pharmacy benefit manager shall
include any amounts paid by the enrollee or paid on behalf of the enrollee by another person that
is either:
(1) Without a generic equivalent; or
(2) With a generic equivalent where the enrollee has obtained access to the prescription
drug through any of the following:
(i) Prior authorization;
(ii) A step therapy protocol; and
(iii) The healthcare plan or carrier’s exceptions and appeals process.
(b) If under federal law, application of subsection (a) of this section would result in Health
Savings Account ineligibility under 26 U.S.C. § 223 (Internal Revenue Code), this requirement
shall apply only for Health Savings Account qualified High Deductible Health Plans with respect
to the deductible of such a plan after the enrollee has satisfied the minimum deductible under 26
U.S.C. § 223, except for items or services that are preventive care pursuant to 26 U.S.C. §
223(c)(2)(C) (Internal Revenue Code), in which case the requirements of subsection (a) of this
section shall apply regardless of satisfaction of the minimum deductible under 26 U.S.C. § 223.
(c) This section shall apply with respect to health plans that are entered into, amended,
extended, or renewed on or after January 1, 2027.
SECTION 3. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC005917
========
LC005917 - Page 2 of 3